Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.040

Limitation of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of veterinary medicine by those who are in compliance with chapter 18.92 RCW;

(2) The practice of animal massage by those who are in compliance with chapter 18.108 RCW;

(3) The practice of animal massage therapy by a person who is a regular student in an educational program whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor; or

(4) The use of animal massage techniques by the owner of the animal who is the recipient of the services or by an employee of the owner or another person providing gratuitous assistance.

[ 2007 c 70 s 5.]